Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1098.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 26 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 305.1. Advance notice to condemnee.(a) Notice before filing.-- At least 30 days before filing a declaration of taking, the condemnor shall give written notice to the proposed condemnee, to any mortgagee of record and to any lienholder of record.(b) Service.-- Service shall be made in accordance with section 305(b) (relating to notice to condemnee).(c) Contents.-- The notice shall include all of the 123456789101112131415161718192021 following:(1) A statement that the condemnor intends to file a declaration of taking for the acquisition of all or part of the property not less than 30 days from the date of the notice.(2) The name, mailing address, telephone number and email address for a representative of the condemnor.(3) The name of the proposed condemnee to whom the proposed condemnation is directed.(4) A statement that all or a portion of the property may be condemned for the condemnor's project.(5) A description of the area proposed to be condemned sufficient for identification and an engineering or survey plan sheet showing the area in relation to nearby improvements.(6) A brief description of the purpose of the proposed condemnation, including the condemnor's proposed project.(7) A brief explanation of eminent domain practice in this Commonwealth, including:(i) what eminent domain is;(ii) the rights of a condemnee, including the ability to retain counsel;(iii) that counsel in these matters may be engaged on a contingent fee basis;(iv) the availability and limits of reimbursement for appraisal, attorney and engineering fees under section 710 (relating to limited reimbursement of appraisal, attorney and engineering fees), and that the condemnor may pay such fees directly, in its discretion and consistent with Federal and State law;20250SB1098PN1340 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) how just compensation is determined and secured;(vi) the next procedural steps if a declaration of taking is filed; and(vii) how to raise preliminary objections under section 306 (relating to preliminary objections), including challenges to the power or right to condemn, the sufficiency of the security, the procedure followed or the declaration of taking.(d) Filing, compliance and objections.-- Filing a copy of the notice and proof of service together with the declaration of taking and the security required under sections 302 (relating to declaration of taking) and 303 (relating to security required) shall constitute compliance with this section. Failure to comply with this section shall render the declaration of taking deficient and is a basis to sustain preliminary objections under section 306(a)(3)(ii).(e) Public posting.-- Within 24 hours after issuing the first notice under subsection (a), the condemnor shall post a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website, if available, and at its principal office. The posting shall include, at a minimum, the information described under subsection (c)(2), (4), (5) and (6).Section 2. Section 702 of Title 26 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 702. Measure of damages.* * *(d) Property subject to conservation easement or agricultural security area.-- If condemned property is subject to a conservation easement or is designated as an agricultural security area, any reduction in value attributable solely to the 20250SB1098PN1340 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 easement or designation shall be disregarded when determining all of the following:(1) The fair market value of the condemnee's entire property interest immediately before the condemnation.(2) The value of the condemnee's property interest remaining immediately after the condemnation, as affected by the condemnation.Section 3. Section 705 of Title 26 is amended to read:§ 705. Contiguous tracts and unity of use.Where all or a part of several contiguous tracts in substantially identical ownership is condemned or a part of several noncontiguous tracts in substantially identical ownership which are used together for a unified purpose is condemned, damages shall be assessed as if the tracts were one parcel. Tracts within the larger parcel may have different highest and best uses. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an appraiser from assigning different highest and best uses to separate tracts that comprise the larger parcel. As used in this section, the term "larger parcel" means the combined property that is treated as one parcel under this section.Section 4. Section 710(a) of Title 26 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 710. Limited reimbursement of appraisal, attorney and engineering fees.(a) General rule.--(1) The owner of any right, title or interest in real property acquired or injured by an acquiring agency, who is not eligible for reimbursement of fees under section 306(g) (relating to preliminary objections), 308(d) (relating to 20250SB1098PN1340 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revocation of condemnation proceedings) or 709 (relating to condemnee's costs where no declaration of taking filed), shall be reimbursed in an amount not to exceed [$4,000] $6,500 per property[, regardless of] and per right, title or interest[,] as a payment toward reasonable expenses actually incurred for appraisal, attorney and engineering fees, except where the taking is for an easement related to underground piping for water or sewer infrastructure, in which case the reimbursement is limited to $1,000, regardless of right, title or interest.(2) Beginning January 1 next following the effective date of this paragraph, and each January 1 thereafter, the maximum reimbursement amounts under paragraph (1) shall be increased by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for the most recent 12-month period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect.* * *(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "r eal property" means e ach separately deeded parcel that comprises the larger parcel as defined in section 705 (relating to contiguous tracts and unity of use).Section 5. Sections 713 and 902 of Title 26 are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 713. Delay compensation.* * *(d) Scope.--Compensation for delay shall be payable on all 20250SB1098PN1340 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 damages and payments awarded or paid under this title, including damages awarded under this chapter and Chapter 9 (relating to special damages for displacement), and shall be calculated and paid as specified under this section.§ 902. Moving and related expenses of displaced persons.* * *(c) Goodwill of business or farm operation.--(1) A displaced person who is displaced from a place of business or from a farm operation shall be entitled, in addition to any payment under subsection (a) and damages under subsection (b), to compensation for loss of goodwill if the displaced person proves all of the following:(i) The loss is caused by an acquisition or displacing activity or by injury to the remainder of property retained by the owner, determined under section 705 (relating to contiguous tracts and unity of use).(ii) The compensation is not duplicated in any other compensation paid or awarded under this title.(2) The acquiring agency may rebut compensation under this subsection by proving that the loss could have reasonably been avoided by relocating the business or farm operation within five miles of its precondemnation location or by taking steps and adopting procedures that a reasonably prudent person would take to preserve goodwill.(3) Goodwill shall be valued as of the date of the condemnation.(4) If the parties do not agree on the value of goodwill, the displaced person shall make the business's or farm operation's State tax returns available to the viewers or the court. On terms and conditions that preserve 20250SB1098PN1340 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 confidentiality, the viewers or the court shall make the returns available to the acquiring agency solely to determine compensation under this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to affect any other right to discovery or to production of documents, papers, books and accounts.(5) If the value of goodwill is negative, damages under this subsection shall be zero.(6) As used in this subsection, the term "g oodwill" means the intangible asset of a business or farm operation that represents the excess of the purchase price of an acquired business over the fair value of its identifiable net assets and reflects factors such as location, reputation, customer loyalty, management and similar elements that contribute to future economic benefits.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB1098PN1340 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516